North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-09 Aid to Dependent Children

50-09-01.
Definitions. [Effective through August 31, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Account” means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, share account, share draft account, savings account, time deposit account, securities account, money market mutual fund account, or any other account or arrangement that reflects an owner’s share or similar equity interest issued by an entity that is registered as an investment company under the federal investment company laws, to the extent the owner is permitted to redeem the share or interest by an order for payment to a third party.

“Assistance” means money payments with respect to, or goods and services provided for dependent children, including payments for the care of unmarried mothers or fathers and their infants.

“Child support” has the meaning provided in section 14-09-09.10.

“Dependent child” means any needy child who is described in a state plan for aid and services to needy families submitted pursuant to title IV-A.

“Financial institution” means:

A depository institution, as defined in section 3(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act [12 U.S.C. 1813(c)];

An institution-affiliated party, as defined in section 3(u) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act [12 U.S.C. 1813(u)];

Any federal credit union or state credit union, as defined in section 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act [12 U.S.C. 1752], including an institution-affiliated party of such a credit union, as defined in section 206(r) of the Federal Credit Union Act [12 U.S.C. 1786(r)]; and

Any benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, securities intermediary, money market mutual fund, or similar entity authorized to do business in the state.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the state agency.

“Obligor” has the meaning provided in section 14-09-09.10.

“Past-due support” has the meaning provided in section 14-09-09.10.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the United States department of health and human services.

“Securities account” has the meaning provided in section 41-08-41.

“Securities intermediary” has the meaning provided in section 41-08-02, but does not include a clearing corporation.

“State agency” means the North Dakota department of human services.

“Title IV-A” means title IV-A of the Social Security Act, as adopted by title I of Pub. L. 104-193 [110 Stat. 2110 et seq.; 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.].

“Title IV-B” means title IV-B of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 90-248, title II, sec. 240(c); 81 Stat. 911; 42 U.S.C. 620 et seq.], as amended.

“Title IV-D” means title IV-D of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 93-647; 88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.].

“Title IV-E” means title IV-E of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 96-272, title I, sec. 101(a)(1); 94 Stat. 501; 42 U.S.C. 670 et seq.], as amended.

“Work activity” means any activity permitted or required to be treated as work for purposes of calculating a work participation rate.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 1; 1939, ch. 194, § 1; 1941, ch. 243, § 1; 1943, ch. 221, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0901; S.L. 1945, ch. 278, § 1; 1947, ch. 314, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 50-0901; S.L. 1965, ch. 324, § 1; 1971, ch. 467, § 1; 1973, ch. 384, § 1; 1975, ch. 442, § 1; 1981, ch. 486, § 24; 1987, ch. 571, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, § 53; 1999, ch. 282, § 16; 2003, ch. 411, § 2; 2007, ch. 417, § 6; 2019, ch. 391, § 94, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 6 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-01.
Definitions. [Effective September 1, 2022]

In this chapter, unless the context or subject matter otherwise requires:

“Account” means a demand deposit account, checking or negotiable withdrawal order account, share account, share draft account, savings account, time deposit account, securities account, money market mutual fund account, or any other account or arrangement that reflects an owner’s share or similar equity interest issued by an entity that is registered as an investment company under the federal investment company laws, to the extent the owner is permitted to redeem the share or interest by an order for payment to a third party.

“Assistance” means money payments with respect to, or goods and services provided for dependent children, including payments for the care of unmarried mothers or fathers and their infants.

“Child support” has the meaning provided in section 14-09-09.10.

“Dependent child” means any needy child who is described in a state plan for aid and services to needy families submitted pursuant to title IV-A.

“Financial institution” means:

A depository institution, as defined in section 3(c) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act [12 U.S.C. 1813(c)];

An institution-affiliated party, as defined in section 3(u) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act [12 U.S.C. 1813(u)];

Any federal credit union or state credit union, as defined in section 101 of the Federal Credit Union Act [12 U.S.C. 1752], including an institution-affiliated party of such a credit union, as defined in section 206(r) of the Federal Credit Union Act [12 U.S.C. 1786(r)]; and

Any benefit association, insurance company, safe deposit company, securities intermediary, money market mutual fund, or similar entity authorized to do business in the state.

“Human service zone” means a county or consolidated group of counties administering human services within a designated area in accordance with an agreement or plan approved by the state agency.

“Obligor” has the meaning provided in section 14-09-09.10.

“Past-due support” has the meaning provided in section 14-09-09.10.

“Secretary” means the secretary of the United States department of health and human services.

“Securities account” has the meaning provided in section 41-08-41.

“Securities intermediary” has the meaning provided in section 41-08-02, but does not include a clearing corporation.

“State agency” means the department of health and human services.

“Title IV-A” means title IV-A of the Social Security Act, as adopted by title I of Pub. L. 104-193 [110 Stat. 2110 et seq.; 42 U.S.C. 601 et seq.].

“Title IV-B” means title IV-B of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 90-248, title II, sec. 240(c); 81 Stat. 911; 42 U.S.C. 620 et seq.], as amended.

“Title IV-D” means title IV-D of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 93-647; 88 Stat. 2351; 42 U.S.C. 651 et seq.].

“Title IV-E” means title IV-E of the Social Security Act [Pub. L. 96-272, title I, sec. 101(a)(1); 94 Stat. 501; 42 U.S.C. 670 et seq.], as amended.

“Work activity” means any activity permitted or required to be treated as work for purposes of calculating a work participation rate.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 1; 1939, ch. 194, § 1; 1941, ch. 243, § 1; 1943, ch. 221, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 50-0901; S.L. 1945, ch. 278, § 1; 1947, ch. 314, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 50-0901; S.L. 1965, ch. 324, § 1; 1971, ch. 467, § 1; 1973, ch. 384, § 1; 1975, ch. 442, § 1; 1981, ch. 486, § 24; 1987, ch. 571, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, § 53; 1999, ch. 282, § 16; 2003, ch. 411, § 2; 2007, ch. 417, § 6; 2019, ch. 391, § 94, effective January 1, 2020; 2021, ch. 352, § 414, effective September 1, 2022.

50-09-02.
Duties of the state agency.

The state agency shall:

Take such action and adopt rules as may become necessary to entitle the state to receive funds from the federal government under title IV-A.

Supervise the administration of temporary assistance for needy families throughout the state of North Dakota.

Take such action, give such directions, and adopt rules as may be necessary or desirable to carry out the provisions of this chapter, including the adoption and application of suitable standards and procedure to ensure appropriate treatment of all applicants for temporary assistance for needy families.

Cooperate with the federal government in matters of mutual concern pertaining to temporary assistance for needy families, including the adoption of such methods of administration as are found by the state agency to be appropriate for the efficient operation of the plan for such assistance.

Provide such qualified employees and representatives as may be necessary.

Prescribe the form of and print and supply to the human service zones blanks for applications, reports, and such other forms as it may deem necessary and advisable.

Have authority to establish and maintain personnel standards on a merit basis for personnel employed by the state and the human service zone.

Make such reports in such form and containing such information as the federal government from time to time may require.

Make any determinations respecting title IV-A not expressly reserved to the federal government under federal law.

Determine if the terms of any waiver of federal requirements, pertaining to the aid to families with dependent children program, submitted to the federal government before August 22, 1996, are consistent with the requirements of title IV-A.

Determine the expenditures that constitute qualified state expenditures for purposes of this chapter.

Determine the costs that constitute administrative costs for purposes of this chapter.

Determine in any case if assistance provided will be funded through qualified state expenditures, funds made available from the federal government under title IV-A, or a combination thereof.

Assist recipients of temporary assistance for needy families, in a form and manner determined appropriate by the state agency, but which need not be uniform among families or among counties.

Administer all funds appropriated or made available to it for the purpose of carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

Act as the official agency of the state in the administration of the child support enforcement program and medical support enforcement program in conformity with title IV-D. In administering the child support enforcement and medical support enforcement programs, the state agency may contract with any public or private agency or person to discharge the state agency’s duties and must maintain an office in each of the eight planning regions of the state.

Take actions and adopt rules necessary to entitle the state to receive funds from the federal government under the child care and development block grant [42 U.S.C. 9858 et seq.], as amended.

Have authority to establish a program for families that include both a minor child and an incapacitated parent of that minor child, using no federal funds derived from temporary assistance for needy families block grant funds, which otherwise functions in substantially the form and manner of the temporary assistance for needy families program.

For purposes of section 674(e)(2) of the Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 674(e)(2)], approve families, outside of the jurisdiction of the state of North Dakota, for placement of children for adoption.

Act as the official agency of the state in the administration of child and family services in conformity with title IV-B and to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program, unless otherwise directed or determined by the state agency.

Act as the official agency of the state in the administration of federal payments for foster care and adoption assistance in conformity with title IV-E and to direct and supervise human service zone administration of that program, unless otherwise directed or determined by the state agency.

Provide, upon request and insofar as staff resources permit, technical assistance concerning the requirements of title IV-B and title IV-E to courts within this state, including tribal courts, and to state’s attorneys and tribal prosecutors within this state.

Make training available to state’s attorneys and assistant state’s attorneys who are willing to collaborate with colleagues in other counties on petitions to terminate parental rights.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 2; 1941, ch. 243, §§ 2, 14; R.C. 1943, § 50-0902; S.L. 1977, ch. 452, § 1; 1997, ch. 404, § 54; 1999, ch. 282, § 17; 2007, ch. 417, § 7; 2019, ch. 391, § 95, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-02.1.
State agency to submit plans — Administer programs under title IV-A and title IV-D — Establish data system — Provide capacity for electronic funds transfer.

The state agency may submit state plans in forms that meet the requirements for such plans which are, or may be, imposed under title IV-A or title IV-D. The state agency may take actions reasonably necessary to conform the administration of programs under its supervision and direction to the requirements of title IV-A or title IV-D and the state plans submitted thereunder, including the issuance of policy manuals, forms, and program directives. The state agency may seek appropriate waivers of the requirements of federal statutes or regulations as authorized by federal law.

The state agency shall establish a statewide automated data processing system designed to conform to requirements imposed by or under title IV-D. The official records of the state regarding all child support amounts owed, collected, and distributed must be maintained in that system. Notwithstanding section 14-08.1-05, any record of a child support obligation that is currently being enforced in another jurisdiction and not by a child support agency, that is owed by an obligor who is deceased, or that is owed to a deceased obligee for whom disbursement of any collections could not occur under section 14-09-25, may be removed indefinitely from the statewide automated data processing system until a request is received from a party to the child support case to restore those records.

The statewide automated data processing system must provide capability for electronic funds transfer for the purpose of income withholding and interstate collections.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 580, § 1; 1993, ch. 152, § 21; 1997, ch. 404, § 55; 2007, ch. 148, § 12; 2009, ch. 419, § 11; 2021, ch. 30, § 12, effective July 1, 2021.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 11 of chapter 419, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 148, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-02.2.
Assistance for adopted children with special needs.

Assistance provided under this chapter or chapter 50-24.1 after adoption to a child with special needs must be provided without regard to the income or resources of the adopting parents. Except as provided in this section, such assistance continues until:

The adopted child is emancipated or dies;

The adopted child has attained the age of eighteen or up to the date the individual attains the age of twenty-one, as elected by the state agency under section 475(8)(B) of the federal Social Security Act [42 U.S.C. 675 (8)(B)];

The adoption is terminated;

A determination of ineligibility is made by the state agency;

The state agency determines the adoptive parents are no longer legally responsible for support of the child who has not attained eighteen years of age, as the adoptive parent’s parental rights have been terminated or the child is emancipated, marries, or enlists in the military; or

The state agency determines the adoptive parents are no longer providing support to the child.

Assistance provided to an adopted child must continue regardless of the residence of the adopting parents. The state agency may require, as a condition of receiving assistance under this chapter or chapter 50-24.1, that the adopting parents enter a contract or agreement regarding the type of assistance to be received; the amount of assistance; the identity of the physical, mental, or emotional condition for which medical assistance is received; or any conditions for continued receipt of assistance. A child with special needs is a child legally available for adoptive placement whose custody has been awarded to a public agency authorized by law to receive and provide care for the child and who is seven years of age or older; under eighteen years of age with a physical, emotional, or mental disability or has been diagnosed by a licensed physician, physician assistant, or advanced practice registered nurse to be at high risk for such a disability; a member of a minority; or a member of a sibling group. Once an adoption assistance agreement is signed with the adoptive parent, the state agency shall obtain the concurrence of the adoptive parent if any changes in the payment amount are made, unless the assistance is discontinued under subsection 1.

Source:

S.L. 1991, ch. 509, § 6; 2003, ch. 138, § 87; 2003, ch. 412, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 96, effective January 1, 2020; 2019, ch. 402, § 1, effective August 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 365, § 1, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 50-09-02.2 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 96 of Chapter 391, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2124; and Section 1 of Chapter 402, Session Laws 2019, Senate Bill 2112.

50-09-02.3.
Department to apply for waiver. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 464, § 1.

50-09-02.4.
State case registry.

The statewide automated data processing system established under section 50-09-02.1 must include a registry that contains records with respect to:

Each child support case in which services are being provided by the state agency under title IV-D; and

Each child support order established or modified in this state on or after October 1, 1998.

The case records must use standardized data elements for both parents and contain other information the secretary requires.

Each case record concerning a case with respect to which services are being provided by the state agency under title IV-D must:

Include payment records consistent with the requirements of title IV-D, which include:

The amount of current monthly or other periodic support owed under the order and other amounts, including arrearages, interest, late payment penalties, fees, and amounts determined under section 14-09-09.30, due or past due under the order;

Any amount described in paragraph 1 that has been collected;

The distribution of collected amounts;

The birthdate and the social security number of any child for whom an order requires the provision of support; and

The amount necessary to satisfy any lien imposed under chapter 35-34 or established as a judgment lien under section 14-08.1-05.

Be established, maintained, updated, and monitored on the basis of:

Information on administrative actions and administrative and judicial proceedings and orders relating to paternity and child support;

Information obtained from comparison with federal, state, and local sources of information;

Information on child support collections and distributions; and

Any other relevant information.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 56; 1999, ch. 141, § 21.

50-09-02.5.
Required uses of statewide automated data processing system.

The statewide automated data processing system established under section 50-09-02.1 must, in accordance with requirements of title IV-D, and regulations, formats, and operating requirements of the secretary adopted thereunder:

Effective October 1, 1998, provide comparisons respecting:

Federal and state case registry information;

Federal and state parent locator information;

Information secured under this chapter, chapter 50-24.1, similar laws administered in other states, and such other programs designated by the secretary as necessary to perform state agency functions under title IV-D, and under the respective programs; and

Information gathered by other agencies of this state, agencies of other states, and interstate networks as necessary and appropriate to carry out state agency duties respecting title IV-D or to assist other states to carry out similar duties;

Effective October 1, 1998, be used by the state disbursement unit in the performance of functions including:

Timely transmission of orders and notices to income payers for the withholding of income using uniform formats prescribed by the secretary;

Ongoing monitoring to promptly identify failures to make timely payment of support;

Automatic use of enforcement procedures if payments are not timely made; and

Be used, to the maximum extent feasible, to receive and disburse child support payments through electronic fund transfers; and

Be used, to the maximum extent feasible, to implement the expedited administrative procedures required by title IV-D.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 57.

50-09-02.6.
State agency to submit plans and administer programs under title IV-B and title IV-E — Make application for federal funds.

The state agency may submit state plans in forms that meet the requirements for such plans which are, or may be, imposed under title IV-B or title IV-E. The state agency may take actions reasonably necessary to conform the administration of programs under its supervision and direction to the requirements of title IV-B or title IV-E and the state plans submitted thereunder, including the issuance of policy manuals, forms, and program directives. The state agency may seek appropriate waivers of the requirements of federal statutes or regulations as may be authorized by federal law.

The state agency may apply for additional or conditionally available funds, such as adoption incentive payments, as may be made available under title IV-B or title IV-E, and may take any action reasonably necessary to support an application.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 282, § 19.

50-09-02.7.
Child support arrears registry.

The state case registry maintained under section 50-09-02.4 must include a registry of any obligor who owes past-due support in an amount greater than two times the obligor’s current or most recent monthly support obligation as defined in section 14-09-09.10 or two thousand dollars, whichever is less. As used in this chapter, “arrears registry” means the registry maintained under this section.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 415, § 16.

50-09-03.
Duties of human service zone.

In the administration of assistance under this chapter, a human service zone shall, unless otherwise directed or determined by the state agency:

Administer the temporary assistance for needy families program in its human service zone, subject to the rules of the state agency.

Report to the state agency at such times and in such manner and form as the state agency, from time to time, may direct.

Submit annually, through the human service zone director, to the state agency a budget containing an estimate and supporting data, setting forth the amount of money needed to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

Cooperate with juvenile courts and licensed children’s agencies.

Administer child and family services under the direction and supervision of the state agency in conformity with title IV-B.

Administer federal payments for foster care and adoption assistance under the direction and supervision of the state agency in conformity with title IV-E.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 3; 1941, ch. 243, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 50-0903; S.L. 1977, ch. 452, § 2; 1997, ch. 404, § 58; 1999, ch. 282, § 18; 2007, ch. 417, § 8; 2019, ch. 391, § 97, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 8 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-04.
Preservation and protection of religious faith.

The county, human service zone, and state agencies shall preserve and protect the religious faith of children coming under their jurisdiction.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 4; 1941, ch. 243, § 4; R.C. 1943, § 50-0904; 2019, ch. 391, § 98, effective January 1, 2020.

50-09-05.
Eligibility for assistance. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1975, ch. 447, § 5.

50-09-06.
Application for assistance.

Application for assistance under this chapter must be made to the human service zone or state agency in the manner and form prescribed by the state agency. The application must contain such information as the state agency may require, and the action of the state agency in approving and granting assistance or in disapproving and denying assistance is final and binding on the human service zone.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 7; 1941, ch. 243, § 7; 1943, ch. 221, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 50-0906; S.L. 1977, ch. 452, § 3; 1987, ch. 571, § 3; 1989, ch. 148, § 35; 1997, ch. 404, § 59; 2001, ch. 418, § 2; 2019, ch. 391, § 99, effective January 1, 2020.

50-09-06.1.
Assignment of support rights.

An application under this chapter is deemed to create and effect an assignment of all rights to support, which a family member or foster child may have or come to have, to the state agency. The assignment:

Is effective as to all current support obligations and periods of eligibility;

Is effective as to all accrued support obligations with respect to a foster care child;

Is limited to the total cost of benefits provided to the family or foster child;

Terminates when eligibility ceases, except with respect to any support obligation unpaid at that time; and

Is not effective as to any child subject to a benefit cap imposed under section 50-09-29.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 571, § 4; 2001, ch. 12, § 27; 2001, ch. 418, § 3; 2015, ch. 126, § 12, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 126, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

50-09-06.2.
State agency may compromise claims.

The state agency may compromise claims arising out of assignments made under sections 50-09-06 and 50-09-06.1, on such terms as it may deem just and appropriate. The state agency may not be compelled to compromise any claim.

Source:

S.L. 1993, ch. 152, § 22.

50-09-07.
Investigation by human service zone or state agency.

If a human service zone or state agency receives an application for assistance, or assistance has been granted, under this chapter, the human service zone, unless otherwise directed or determined by the state agency, promptly shall make an investigation and record of the circumstances of the applicant, or child, or both, in order to ascertain the facts supporting the application or the granting of assistance and shall obtain such other information as may be required by the rules and regulations of the state agency.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 8; 1941, ch. 243, § 8, subs. a; R.C. 1943, § 50-0907; S.L. 1951, ch. 288, § 1; 1957 Supp., § 50-0907; S.L. 1977, ch. 452, § 4; 1979, ch. 508, § 1; 2019, ch. 391, § 100, effective January 1, 2020.

50-09-08.
Investigations — Power of human service zone, state agency, and employees.

In the investigation of applications under the provisions of this chapter, the human service zone, the state agency, and the officials and employees of such agencies charged with the administration and enforcement of this chapter may:

Conduct examinations;

Require the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers; and

Make application to the district court of the county to compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers.

The state agency may request from other state, county, human service zones, and local agencies information deemed necessary to carry out the child support enforcement program. All officers and employees of state, county, and local agencies shall cooperate with the state agency in locating absent parents of children to whom an obligation of support is owed or on whose behalf assistance is being provided and, on request, shall supply the state agency with available information relative to the location, income, social security number, and property holdings of the absent parent, notwithstanding any provision of law making that information confidential. Any person acting under the authority of the state agency who pursuant to this subsection obtains information from the office of the state tax commissioner, the confidentiality of which is protected by law, may not divulge such information except to the extent necessary for the administration of the child support enforcement program or when otherwise directed by judicial order or when otherwise provided by law.

The officers and employees designated by the human service zones or the state agency may administer oaths and affirmations.

Source:

S.L. 1937, ch. 209, § 8; 1941, ch. 243, § 8, subs. b; R.C. 1943, § 50-0908; S.L. 1977, ch. 452, § 5; 1979, ch. 597, § 5; 2007, ch. 417, § 9; 2019, ch. 391, § 101, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 9 of chapter 417, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.

50-09-08.1.
Stepfather’s liability for dependent child. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1971, ch. 153, § 2.

50-09-08.2.
Power of state agency and employees and agents.

In implementing programs under title IV D, the state agency, and the officials, employees, and agents of the agency may:

Conduct examinations;

Require by subpoena the attendance of witnesses and the production of books, records, and papers;

Compensate witnesses and individuals producing books, records, including records maintained in automated databases, and papers in amounts determined by the state agency, not to exceed actual reasonable costs incurred and not to include any costs incurred by a financial institution that has not entered into an agreement under subdivision h nor costs incurred by any person that reflects the difference between responding to a subpoena and providing information under subdivision g or k;

Impose a fiscal sanction of no more than twenty five dollars for each day against a person who fails to attend as a witness or produce books, records, or papers;

Require genetic testing of appropriate individuals when necessary in disputed paternity cases, to determine the relationship of parent and child, and:

Pay the costs of such testing, subject to recoupment from the alleged father if paternity is established; and

Obtain additional testing in any case if an initial test result is contested, upon request and advance payment by the contestant;

Make application to the district court to compel participation in genetic testing, the attendance of witnesses, the production of books, records, and papers, and the payment of fiscal sanctions imposed under this section;

Notwithstanding any provision of this code making the records confidential, in addition to or in lieu of a subpoena, obtain access, including automated access in the case of records maintained in automated databases, to:

Records of other state and local government agencies, including:

Vital statistics, including records of marriage, birth, and divorce;

Local tax and revenue records, including information on residence address, employer, income, and assets;

Records concerning real and titled personal property;

Records of occupational and professional licenses and records concerning the ownership and control of corporations, partnerships, and other business entities;

Employment security records;

Workforce safety and insurance records identifying the last known address of a person who owes or who is owed support, the wage loss benefits, permanent partial impairment benefits, death benefits, or additional benefits that person has received or is entitled to receive from the organization, and whether and where that person is currently employed;

Records of all agencies administering public assistance programs;

Records of the department of transportation, which access is not subject to the requirements in section 39-16-03;

Corrections records;

Law enforcement records; and

Subject to an agreement with the state tax commissioner, state tax and revenue records, including information on residence address, employer, income, and assets; and

Certain information contained in records held by private entities with respect to individuals who owe or are owed child support, or against or with respect to whom a child support obligation is sought, subject to safeguards on privacy and information security, consisting of:

The names, addresses, social security numbers, and other requested relevant income or asset information of such individuals and the names and addresses of the employers of such individuals, as appearing in customer records of public utilities, including cellular and wireless telephone service providers, and cable television companies, pursuant to an administrative subpoena if requested; and

Information on assets and liabilities on those individuals held by financial institutions;

Enter into agreements with financial institutions doing business in the state, and with the assistance, or through the agency, of the secretary, with financial institutions doing business in two or more states:

To develop and operate, in coordination with those financial institutions, a data match system, using automated data exchanges to the maximum extent feasible, in which each such financial institution is required to provide in each calendar quarter the name, record address, social security number or other taxpayer identification number, and other identifying information for each noncustodial parent who maintains an account at such financial institution and who owes past due support, as identified by the state agency by name and social security number or other taxpayer number; and

Under which such financial institution, in response to a notice of lien or an execution, will encumber or surrender, as the case may be, assets held by such institution on behalf of any noncustodial parent who is subject to a lien for unpaid child support;

For purposes of locating parents or alleged parents of children receiving services under title IV-D, provide all federal and state agencies conducting activities under title IV-D with access to:

Records of the department of transportation; and

Law enforcement records;

Notwithstanding any provision of law making the records confidential:

Provide access to information identifying the amount of payment necessary to obtain the release of a lien taken by the state agency in any property to secure the payment of child support; and

Upon payment of a sufficient amount, satisfy and release that lien; and

Upon agreement, exchange information, including social security numbers, with a person listed in subdivision g for the purpose of identifying individuals who owe or are owed child support, or against or with respect to whom a child support obligation is sought, and any income, assets, or liabilities of those individuals.

All information received under this section, if confidential under some other provision of law, is subject to the penalties under section 50-06-15 and is confidential, except that the information may be used in the administration of any program administered by or under the supervision and direction of the state agency and as specifically authorized by the rules of the state agency. Any information received under this section, if not subject to section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota in the possession of the person providing the information, is exempt from section 44-04-18 and section 6 of article XI of the Constitution of North Dakota. Any person acting under the authority of the state agency who pursuant to this subsection obtains information from the office of the state tax commissioner, the confidentiality of which is protected by law, may not divulge such information except to the extent necessary for the administration of the child support enforcement program or when otherwise directed by judicial order or otherwise provided by law.

As provided in title IV-D, a person is immune from suit or any liability under any federal or state law:

For any disclosure of information, in any form, made under this section, to the state agency, a county agency, a human service zone, or an official, employee, or agent of either;

For encumbering or surrendering any assets held by a financial institution in response to a notice of lien or an execution issued by the state agency as provided in section 28-21-05.2 and chapter 35-34; or

For any other action taken in good faith to comply with the requirements of this section.

The court shall award reasonable attorney’s fees and costs against any person who commences an action that is subsequently dismissed by reason of the immunity granted by this section.

The officers and employees designated by the human service zones or the state agency may administer oaths and affirmations.

All employing or contracting entities within this state, including for profit, nonprofit, and governmental employers, shall provide information on the employment, compensation, and benefits of any individual employed by such entity as an employee or contractor within ten days of a request made under subsection 1 or made by the agency of any other jurisdiction charged with administration of programs under title IV D. An entity that receives a request for which a response is required by this section is subject to a fiscal sanction of twenty five dollars for each day, beginning on the eleventh day after the request is made and not complied with.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 404, § 60; 1999, ch. 141, § 22; 2001, ch. 152, § 8; 2001, ch. 232, § 8; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2007, ch. 148, § 13; 2009, ch. 419, § 12; 2019, ch. 391, § 102, effective January 1, 2020.

Effective Date.

The 2009 amendment of this section by section 12 of chapter 419, S.L. 2009 became effective August 1, 2009.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 13 of chapter 148, S.L. 2007 became effective July 1, 2007.